Tennessee, session 114, SB0462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The month of November is observed annually as "Diabetes Awareness Month" in
this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0462
000786
- 1 -